Maryland, session 2026, HB0340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
SUBTITLE 4. SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST INTERSTATE LICENSURE COMPACT.
25–401.
THE SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST INTERSTATE LICENSURE COMPACT IS HEREBY
ENACTED INTO LAW AND ENTERED INTO LAW BY THIS STATE WITH ALL STATES
LEGALLY JOINING IT, IN THE FORM SUBSTANTIALLY AS IT APPEARS IN § 25–402 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
25–402.
SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST INTERSTATE LICENSURE COMPACT.
SECTION 1. PURPOSE.
THE PURPOSE OF THIS COMPACT IS TO FACILITATE THE INTERSTATE
PRACTICE OF SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGY IN EDUCATIONAL OR SCHOOL SETTINGS, AND
IN SO DOING TO IMPROVE THE AVAILABILITY OF SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGICAL
– 1 –

Ch. 617 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SERVICES TO THE PUBLIC. THIS COMPACT IS INTENDED TO ESTABLISH A PATHWAY
TO ALLOW SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGISTS TO OBTAIN EQUIVALENT LICENSES TO
PROVIDE SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGICAL SERVICES IN ANY MEMBER STATE. IN THIS
WAY, THIS COMPACT SHALL ENABLE THE MEMBER STATES TO ENSURE THAT SAFE
AND EFFECTIVE SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGICAL SERVICES ARE AVAILABLE AND
DELIVERED BY APPROPRIATELY QUALIFIED PROFESSIONALS IN THEIR
EDUCATIONAL SETTINGS.
TO FACILITATE THE OBJECTIVES DESCRIBED ABOVE, THIS COMPACT:
A. ENABLES SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGISTS WHO QUALIFY FOR RECEIPT OF AN
EQUIVALENT LICENSE TO PRACTICE IN OTHER MEMBER STATES WITHOUT FIRST
SATISFYING BURDENSOME AND DUPLICATIVE REQUIREMENTS;
B. PROMOTES THE MOBILITY OF SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGISTS BETWEEN AND
AMONG THE MEMBER STATES IN ORDER TO ADDRESS WORKFORCE SHORTAGES AND
TO ENSURE THAT SAFE AND RELIABLE SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGICAL SERVICES ARE
AVAILABLE IN EACH MEMBER STATE;
C. ENHANCES THE PUBLIC ACCESSIBILITY OF SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGICAL
SERVICES BY INCREASING THE AVAILABILITY OF QUALIFIED, LICENSED SCHOOL
PSYCHOLOGISTS THROUGH THE ESTABLISHMENT OF AN EFFICIENT AND
STREAMLINED PATHWAY FOR LICENSEES TO PRACTICE IN OTHER MEMBER STATES;
D. PRESERVES AND RESPECTS THE AUTHORITY OF EACH MEMBER STATE
TO PROTECT THE HEALTH AND SAFETY OF ITS RESIDENTS BY ENSURING THAT ONLY
QUALIFIED, LICENSED PROFESSIONALS ARE AUTHORIZED TO PROVIDE SCHOOL
PSYCHOLOGICAL SERVICES WITHIN THAT STATE;
E. REQUIRES SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGISTS PRACTICING WITHIN A MEMBER
STATE TO COMPLY WITH THE SCOPE OF PRACTICE LAWS PRESENT IN THE STATE
WHERE THE SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGICAL SERVICES ARE BEING PROVIDED;
F. PROMOTES COOPERATION BETWEEN THE MEMBER STATES IN
REGULATING THE PRACTICE OF SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGY WITHIN THOSE STATES; AND
G. FACILITATES THE RELOCATION OF MILITARY MEMBERS AND THEIR
SPOUSES WHO ARE LICENSED TO PROVIDE SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGICAL SERVICES.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 617
A. “ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER” MEANS ANY PERSON WITH FULL–TIME
DUTY STATUS IN THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES, INCLUDING
MEMBERS OF THE NATIONAL GUARD AND RESERVE.
B. “ADVERSE ACTION” MEANS DISCIPLINARY ACTION OR ENCUMBRANCE
IMPOSED ON A LICENSE BY A STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY.
C. “ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM” MEANS A NON–DISCIPLINARY,
PROSECUTORIAL DIVERSION, MONITORING, OR PRACTICE REMEDIATION PROCESS
ENTERED INTO IN LIEU OF AN ADVERSE ACTION WHICH IS APPLICABLE TO A
SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST AND APPROVED BY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY OF
A MEMBER STATE IN WHICH THE PARTICIPATING SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST IS
LICENSED. THIS INCLUDES, BUT IS NOT LIMITED TO, PROGRAMS TO WHICH
LICENSEES WITH SUBSTANCE ABUSE OR ADDICTION ISSUES MAY BE REFERRED IN
LIEU OF AN ADVERSE ACTION.
D. “COMMISSIONER” MEANS THE INDIVIDUAL APPOINTED BY A MEMBER
STATE TO SERVE AS THE REPRESENTATIVE TO THE COMMISSION FOR THAT
MEMBER STATE.
E. “COMPACT” MEANS THIS SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST INTERSTATE
LICENSURE COMPACT.
F. “CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION” MEANS A REQUIREMENT,
IMPOSED BY A MEMBER STATE AS A CONDITION OF LICENSE RENEWAL, TO PROVIDE
EVIDENCE OF SUCCESSFUL PARTICIPATION IN PROFESSIONAL EDUCATIONAL
ACTIVITIES RELEVANT TO THE PROVISION OF SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGICAL SERVICES.
G. “CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECK” MEANS THE SUBMISSION OF
FINGERPRINTS OR OTHER BIOMETRIC INFORMATION FOR A LICENSE APPLICANT
FOR THE PURPOSE OF OBTAINING THAT APPLICANT’S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
INFORMATION, AS DEFINED IN 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(D), AND THE STATE’S CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD REPOSITORY AS DEFINED IN 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(F).
H. “DOCTORAL LEVEL DEGREE” MEANS A GRADUATE DEGREE PROGRAM
THAT CONSISTS OF AT LEAST 90 GRADUATE SEMESTER HOURS IN THE FIELD OF
SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGY, INCLUDING A SUPERVISED INTERNSHIP.
I. “ENCUMBERED LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE THAT A STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY HAS LIMITED IN ANY WAY OTHER THAN THROUGH AN ALTERNATIVE
PROGRAM, INCLUDING TEMPORARY OR PROVISIONAL LICENSES.
– 3 –

Ch. 617 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
J. “EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE” MEANS THE COMMISSION’S CHAIR, VICE
CHAIR, SECRETARY AND TREASURER AND ANY OTHER COMMISSIONERS AS MAY BE
DETERMINED BY COMMISSION RULE OR BYLAW.
K. “EQUIVALENT LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE TO PRACTICE SCHOOL
PSYCHOLOGY THAT A MEMBER STATE HAS IDENTIFIED AS A LICENSE THAT MAY BE
PROVIDED TO SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGISTS FROM OTHER MEMBER STATES PURSUANT
TO THIS COMPACT.
L. “HOME STATE” MEANS THE MEMBER STATE THAT ISSUED THE HOME
STATE LICENSE TO THE LICENSEE AND IS THE LICENSEE’S PRIMARY STATE OF
PRACTICE.
M. “HOME STATE LICENSE” MEANS THE LICENSE THAT IS NOT AN
ENCUMBERED LICENSE ISSUED BY THE HOME STATE TO PROVIDE SCHOOL
PSYCHOLOGICAL SERVICES.
N. “LICENSE” MEANS A CURRENT LICENSE, CERTIFICATION, OR OTHER
AUTHORIZATION GRANTED BY A MEMBER STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY THAT
PERMITS AN INDIVIDUAL TO PROVIDE SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGICAL SERVICES.
O. “LICENSEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HOLDS A LICENSE FROM A
MEMBER STATE TO PROVIDE SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGICAL SERVICES.
P. “MEMBER STATE” MEANS A STATE THAT HAS ENACTED THE COMPACT
AND BEEN ADMITTED TO THE COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS
HEREIN AND COMMISSION RULES.
Q. “MODEL COMPACT” MEANS THE MODEL LANGUAGE FOR THE SCHOOL
PSYCHOLOGIST INTERSTATE LICENSURE COMPACT ON FILE WITH THE COUNCIL OF
STATE GOVERNMENTS OR OTHER ENTITY AS DESIGNATED BY THE COMMISSION.
R. “PRACTICE OF SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGY” MEANS THE DELIVERY OF
SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGICAL SERVICES.
S. “QUALIFYING NATIONAL EXAM” MEANS A NATIONAL LICENSING
EXAMINATION ENDORSED BY THE NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF SCHOOL
PSYCHOLOGISTS AND ANY OTHER EXAM AS APPROVED BY THE RULES OF THE
COMMISSION.
T. “QUALIFYING SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST EDUCATION PROGRAM” MEANS
AN EDUCATION PROGRAM THAT AWARDS A SPECIALIST–LEVEL OR
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 617
DOCTORAL–LEVEL DEGREE OR EQUIVALENT UPON COMPLETION AND IS APPROVED
BY THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION AS MEETING THE NECESSARY MINIMUM
EDUCATIONAL STANDARDS TO ENSURE THAT ITS GRADUATES ARE READY,
QUALIFIED, AND ABLE TO ENGAGE IN THE PRACTICE OF SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGY.
U. “REMOTE STATE” MEANS A MEMBER STATE OTHER THAN THE HOME
STATE WHERE A LICENSEE HOLDS A LICENSE THROUGH THE COMPACT.
V. “RULE” MEANS A REGULATION PROMULGATED BY AN ENTITY,
INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE COMMISSION AND THE STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY OF EACH MEMBER STATE, THAT HAS THE FORCE OF LAW.
W. “SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGICAL SERVICES” MEANS ACADEMIC, MENTAL,
AND BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES, INCLUDING ASSESSMENT, PREVENTION,
CONSULTATION AND COLLABORATION, INTERVENTION, AND EVALUATION,
PROVIDED BY A SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST IN A SCHOOL AS OUTLINED IN APPLICABLE
PROFESSIONAL STANDARDS AS DETERMINED BY COMMISSION RULE.
X. “SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS MET THE
REQUIREMENTS TO OBTAIN A HOME STATE LICENSE THAT LEGALLY CONVEYS THE
PROFESSIONAL TITLE OF SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST, OR ITS EQUIVALENT AS
DETERMINED BY THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION.
Y. “SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST INTERSTATE LICENSURE COMPACT
COMMISSION” OR “COMMISSION” MEANS THE JOINT GOVERNMENT AGENCY
ESTABLISHED BY THIS COMPACT WHOSE MEMBERSHIP CONSISTS OF
REPRESENTATIVES FROM EACH MEMBER STATE THAT HAS ENACTED THE
COMPACT, AND AS FURTHER DESCRIBED IN SECTION 7.
Z. “SCOPE OF PRACTICE” MEANS THE PROCEDURES, ACTIONS, AND
PROCESSES A SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST LICENSED IN A STATE IS PERMITTED TO
UNDERTAKE IN THAT STATE AND THE CIRCUMSTANCES UNDER WHICH THAT
LICENSEE IS PERMITTED TO UNDERTAKE THOSE PROCEDURES, ACTIONS, AND
PROCESSES. SUCH PROCEDURES, ACTIONS, AND PROCESSES, AND THE
CIRCUMSTANCES UNDER WHICH THEY MAY BE UNDERTAKEN, MAY BE ESTABLISHED
THROUGH MEANS INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, STATUTE, REGULATIONS, CASE
LAW, AND OTHER PROCESSES AVAILABLE TO THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY OR
OTHER GOVERNMENT AGENCY.
AA. “SPECIALIST–LEVEL DEGREE” MEANS A DEGREE PROGRAM THAT
REQUIRES AT LEAST 60 GRADUATE SEMESTER HOURS OR EQUIVALENT IN THE FIELD
OF SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGY INCLUDING A SUPERVISED INTERNSHIP.
– 5 –

Ch. 617 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
BB. “STATE” MEANS ANY STATE, COMMONWEALTH, DISTRICT, OR
TERRITORY OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA.
CC. “STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY” MEANS A MEMBER STATE’S
REGULATORY BODY RESPONSIBLE FOR ISSUING LICENSES OR OTHERWISE
OVERSEEING THE PRACTICE OF SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGY.
DD. “STATE SPECIFIC REQUIREMENT” MEANS A REQUIREMENT FOR
LICENSURE COVERED IN COURSEWORK OR EXAMINATION THAT INCLUDES CONTENT
OF UNIQUE INTEREST TO THE STATE.
EE. “UNENCUMBERED LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE THAT AUTHORIZES A
LICENSEE TO ENGAGE IN THE FULL AND UNRESTRICTED PRACTICE OF SCHOOL
PSYCHOLOGY.
SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT.
A. TO BE ELIGIBLE TO JOIN THIS COMPACT, AND TO MAINTAIN
ELIGIBILITY AS A MEMBER STATE, A STATE MUST:
1. ENACT A COMPACT STATUTE THAT IS NOT MATERIALLY
DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL COMPACT AS DEFINED IN THE COMMISSION’S
RULES;
2. PARTICIPATE IN THE SHARING OF INFORMATION WITH OTHER
MEMBER STATES AS REASONABLY NECESSARY TO ACCOMPLISH THE OBJECTIVES
OF THIS COMPACT, AND AS FURTHER DEFINED IN SECTION 8;
3. IDENTIFY AND MAINTAIN WITH THE COMMISSION A LIST OF
EQUIVALENT LICENSES AVAILABLE TO LICENSEES WHO HOLD A HOME STATE
LICENSE UNDER THIS COMPACT;
4. HAVE A MECHANISM IN PLACE FOR RECEIVING AND
INVESTIGATING COMPLAINTS ABOUT LICENSEES;
5. NOTIFY THE COMMISSION, IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE TERMS OF
THE COMPACT AND THE COMMISSION’S RULES, OF ANY ADVERSE ACTION TAKEN
AGAINST A LICENSEE, OR OF THE AVAILABILITY OF INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION
THAT RELATES TO A LICENSEE OR APPLICANT FOR LICENSURE;
6. REQUIRE THAT APPLICANTS FOR A HOME STATE LICENSE HAVE:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 617
A. TAKEN AND PASSED A QUALIFYING NATIONAL EXAM AS
DEFINED BY THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION;
B. COMPLETED A MINIMUM OF 1200 HOURS OF SUPERVISED
INTERNSHIP, OF WHICH AT LEAST 600 MUST HAVE BEEN COMPLETED IN A SCHOOL,
PRIOR TO BEING APPROVED FOR LICENSURE; AND
C. GRADUATED FROM A QUALIFYING SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST
EDUCATION PROGRAM; AND
7. COMPLY WITH THE TERMS OF THIS COMPACT AND THE RULES OF
THE COMMISSION.
B. EACH MEMBER STATE SHALL GRANT AN EQUIVALENT LICENSE TO
PRACTICE SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGY IN THAT STATE UPON APPLICATION BY A
LICENSEE WHO SATISFIES THE CRITERIA OF SECTION 4.A. EACH MEMBER STATE
SHALL GRANT RENEWAL OF THE EQUIVALENT LICENSE TO A LICENSEE WHO
SATISFIES THE CRITERIA OF SECTION 4.B.
C. MEMBER STATES MAY SET AND COLLECT A FEE FOR GRANTING AN
EQUIVALENT LICENSE.
SECTION 4. SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT.
A. TO OBTAIN AND MAINTAIN AN EQUIVALENT LICENSE FROM A REMOTE
STATE UNDER THIS COMPACT, A LICENSEE MUST:
1. HOLD AND MAINTAIN AN ACTIVE HOME STATE LICENSE;
2. SATISFY ANY APPLICABLE STATE SPECIFIC REQUIREMENTS
ESTABLISHED BY THE MEMBER STATE AFTER AN EQUIVALENT LICENSE IS
GRANTED;
3. COMPLETE ANY ADMINISTRATIVE OR APPLICATION
REQUIREMENTS WHICH THE COMMISSION MAY ESTABLISH BY RULE, AND PAY ANY
ASSOCIATED FEES; AND
4. COMPLETE ANY REQUIREMENTS FOR RENEWAL IN THE HOME
STATE, INCLUDING APPLICABLE CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION
REQUIREMENTS.
5. UPON THEIR APPLICATION TO RECEIVE A LICENSE UNDER THIS
COMPACT, UNDERGO A CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECK IN THE MEMBER STATE IN
– 7 –

Ch. 617 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
WHICH THE EQUIVALENT LICENSE IS SOUGHT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS AND
REGULATIONS OF SUCH MEMBER STATE.
B. TO RENEW AN EQUIVALENT LICENSE IN A MEMBER STATE OTHER THAN
THE HOME STATE, A LICENSEE MUST ONLY APPLY FOR RENEWAL, COMPLETE A
BACKGROUND CHECK, AND PAY RENEWAL FEES AS DETERMINED BY THE LICENSING
AUTHORITY.
SECTION 5. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS OR THEIR SPOUSES.
A LICENSEE WHO IS AN ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER OR IS THE SPOUSE OF AN
ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER SHALL BE DEEMED TO HOLD A HOME STATE LICENSE
IN ANY OF THE FOLLOWING LOCATIONS:
A. THE LICENSEE’S PERMANENT RESIDENCE;
B. A MEMBER STATE THAT IS THE LICENSEE’S PRIMARY STATE OF
PRACTICE; AND
C. A MEMBER STATE WHERE THE LICENSEE HAS RELOCATED PURSUANT
TO A PERMANENT CHANGE OF STATION (PCS).
SECTION 6. DISCIPLINE/ADVERSE ACTIONS.
A. NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE DEEMED OR CONSTRUED TO
LIMIT THE AUTHORITY OF A MEMBER STATE TO INVESTIGATE OR IMPOSE
DISCIPLINARY MEASURES ON LICENSEES ACCORDING TO THE STATE PRACTICE
LAWS THEREOF.
B. MEMBER STATES SHALL BE AUTHORIZED TO RECEIVE, AND SHALL
PROVIDE, FILES AND INFORMATION REGARDING THE INVESTIGATION AND
DISCIPLINE, IF ANY, OF LICENSEES IN OTHER MEMBER STATES UPON REQUEST.
ANY MEMBER STATE RECEIVING SUCH INFORMATION OR FILES SHALL PROTECT
AND MAINTAIN THE SECURITY AND CONFIDENTIALITY THEREOF, IN AT LEAST THE
SAME MANNER THAT IT MAINTAINS ITS OWN INVESTIGATORY OR DISCIPLINARY
FILES AND INFORMATION. PRIOR TO DISCLOSING ANY DISCIPLINARY OR
INVESTIGATORY INFORMATION RECEIVED FROM ANOTHER MEMBER STATE, THE
DISCLOSING STATE SHALL COMMUNICATE ITS INTENTION AND PURPOSE FOR SUCH
DISCLOSURE TO THE MEMBER STATE WHICH ORIGINALLY PROVIDED THAT
INFORMATION.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 617
SECTION 7. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST INTERSTATE
LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION.
A. THE MEMBER STATES HEREBY CREATE AND ESTABLISH A JOINT
GOVERNMENT AGENCY WHOSE MEMBERSHIP CONSISTS OF ALL MEMBER STATES
THAT HAVE ENACTED THE COMPACT, AND THIS AGENCY SHALL BE KNOWN AS THE
SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST INTERSTATE LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION. THE
COMMISSION IS AN INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE MEMBER STATES ACTING JOINTLY
AND NOT AN INSTRUMENTALITY OF ANY ONE STATE. THE COMMISSION SHALL COME
INTO EXISTENCE ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE COMPACT AS SET
FORTH IN SECTION 11.
B. MEMBERSHIP, VOTING, AND MEETINGS.
1. EACH MEMBER STATE SHALL HAVE AND BE LIMITED TO ONE (1)
COMMISSIONER SELECTED BY THAT MEMBER STATE’S STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY.
2. THE COMMISSIONER SHALL BE THE PRIMARY ADMINISTRATIVE
OFFICER OF THE MEMBER STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY OR THEIR DESIGNEE WHO
IS AN EMPLOYEE OF THE MEMBER STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY.
3. THE COMMISSION SHALL BY RULE OR BYLAW ESTABLISH A TERM
OF OFFICE FOR COMMISSIONERS AND MAY BY RULE OR BYLAW ESTABLISH TERM
LIMITS.
4. THE COMMISSION MAY RECOMMEND REMOVAL OR SUSPENSION
OF ANY COMMISSIONER FROM OFFICE.
5. A MEMBER STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL FILL ANY
VACANCY OF ITS COMMISSIONER OCCURRING ON THE COMMISSION WITHIN 60 DAYS
OF THE VACANCY.
6. EACH COMMISSIONER SHALL BE ENTITLED TO ONE VOTE ON ALL
MATTERS BEFORE THE COMMISSION REQUIRING A VOTE BY COMMISSION
COMMISSIONERS.
7. A COMMISSIONER SHALL VOTE IN PERSON OR BY SUCH OTHER
MEANS AS PROVIDED IN THE BYLAWS. THE BYLAWS MAY PROVIDE FOR
COMMISSIONERS TO MEET BY TELECOMMUNICATION, VIDEO CONFERENCE, OR
OTHER MEANS OF COMMUNICATION.
– 9 –

Ch. 617 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
8. THE COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT LEAST ONCE DURING EACH
CALENDAR YEAR. ADDITIONAL MEETINGS MAY BE HELD AS SET FORTH IN THE
BYLAWS. THE COMMISSION MAY MEET BY TELECOMMUNICATION, VIDEO
CONFERENCE OR OTHER SIMILAR ELECTRONIC MEANS.
C. THE COMMISSION SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING POWERS:
1. ESTABLISH THE FISCAL YEAR OF THE COMMISSION;
2. ESTABLISH CODE OF CONDUCT AND CONFLICT OF INTEREST
POLICIES;
3. ESTABLISH AND AMEND RULES AND BYLAWS;
4. ESTABLISH THE PROCEDURE THROUGH WHICH A LICENSEE MAY
CHANGE THEIR HOME STATE;
5. MAINTAIN ITS FINANCIAL RECORDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
BYLAWS;
6. MEET AND TAKE SUCH ACTIONS AS ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS COMPACT, THE COMMISSION’S RULES, AND THE BYLAWS;
7. INITIATE AND CONCLUDE LEGAL PROCEEDINGS OR ACTIONS IN
THE NAME OF THE COMMISSION, PROVIDED THAT THE STANDING OF ANY MEMBER
STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY TO SUE OR BE SUED UNDER APPLICABLE LAW MAY
NOT BE AFFECTED;
8. MAINTAIN AND CERTIFY RECORDS AND INFORMATION PROVIDED
TO A MEMBER STATE AS THE AUTHENTICATED BUSINESS RECORDS OF THE
COMMISSION, AND DESIGNATE AN AGENT TO DO SO ON THE COMMISSION’S BEHALF;
9. PURCHASE AND MAINTAIN INSURANCE AND BONDS;
10. BORROW, ACCEPT, OR CONTRACT FOR SERVICES OF PERSONNEL,
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, EMPLOYEES OF A MEMBER STATE;
11. CONDUCT AN ANNUAL FINANCIAL REVIEW;
12. HIRE EMPLOYEES, ELECT OR APPOINT OFFICERS, FIX
COMPENSATION, DEFINE DUTIES, GRANT SUCH INDIVIDUALS APPROPRIATE
AUTHORITY TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THE COMPACT, AND ESTABLISH THE
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 617
COMMISSION’S PERSONNEL POLICIES AND PROGRAMS RELATING TO CONFLICTS OF
INTEREST, QUALIFICATIONS OF PERSONNEL, AND OTHER RELATED PERSONNEL
MATTERS;
13. ASSESS AND COLLECT FEES;
14. ACCEPT ANY AND ALL APPROPRIATE GIFTS, DONATIONS, GRANTS
OF MONEY, OTHER SOURCES OF REVENUE, EQUIPMENT, SUPPLIES, MATERIALS, AND
SERVICES, AND RECEIVE, UTILIZE, AND DISPOSE OF THE SAME; PROVIDED THAT AT
ALL TIMES THE COMMISSION SHALL AVOID ANY APPEARANCE OF IMPROPRIETY
AND/OR CONFLICT OF INTEREST;
15. LEASE, PURCHASE, RETAIN, OWN, HOLD, IMPROVE, OR USE ANY
PROPERTY, REAL, PERSONAL, OR MIXED, OR ANY UNDIVIDED INTEREST THEREIN;
16. SELL, CONVEY, MORTGAGE, PLEDGE, LEASE, EXCHANGE,
ABANDON, OR OTHERWISE DISPOSE OF ANY PROPERTY, REAL, PERSONAL, OR MIXED;
17. ESTABLISH A BUDGET AND MAKE EXPENDITURES;
18. BORROW MONEY;
19. APPOINT COMMITTEES, INCLUDING STANDING COMMITTEES,
COMPOSED OF MEMBERS, STATE REGULATORS, STATE LEGISLATORS OR THEIR
REPRESENTATIVES, AND CONSUMER REPRESENTATIVES, AND SUCH OTHER
INTERESTED PERSONS AS MAY BE DESIGNATED IN THIS COMPACT AND THE BYLAWS;
20. PROVIDE AND RECEIVE INFORMATION FROM, AND COOPERATE
WITH, LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES;
21. ESTABLISH AND ELECT AN EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE, INCLUDING
A CHAIR AND A VICE CHAIR;
22. DETERMINE WHETHER A STATE’S ADOPTED LANGUAGE IS
MATERIALLY DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL COMPACT LANGUAGE SUCH THAT THE
STATE WOULD NOT QUALIFY FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT; AND
23. PERFORM SUCH OTHER FUNCTIONS AS MAY BE NECESSARY OR
APPROPRIATE TO ACHIEVE THE PURPOSES OF THIS COMPACT.
D. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE.
– 11 –

Ch. 617 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL HAVE THE POWER TO ACT ON
BEHALF OF THE COMMISSION ACCORDING TO THE TERMS OF THIS COMPACT. THE
POWERS, DUTIES, AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL
INCLUDE:
A. OVERSEE THE DAY–TO–DAY ACTIVITIES OF THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THE COMPACT INCLUDING ENFORCEMENT AND COMPLIANCE
WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT, ITS RULES AND BYLAWS, AND OTHER
SUCH DUTIES AS DEEMED NECESSARY;
B. RECOMMEND TO THE COMMISSION CHANGES TO THE
RULES OR BYLAWS, CHANGES TO THIS COMPACT LEGISLATION, FEES CHARGED TO
MEMBER STATES, FEES CHARGED TO LICENSEES, AND OTHER FEES;
C. ENSURE COMPACT ADMINISTRATION SERVICES ARE
APPROPRIATELY PROVIDED, INCLUDING BY CONTRACT;
D. PREPARE AND RECOMMEND THE BUDGET;
E. MAINTAIN FINANCIAL RECORDS ON BEHALF OF THE
COMMISSION;
F. MONITOR COMPACT COMPLIANCE OF MEMBER STATES
AND PROVIDE COMPLIANCE REPORTS TO THE COMMISSION;
G. ESTABLISH ADDITIONAL COMMITTEES AS NECESSARY;
H. EXERCISE THE POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE COMMISSION
DURING THE INTERIM BETWEEN COMMISSION MEETINGS, EXCEPT FOR ADOPTING
OR AMENDING RULES, ADOPTING OR AMENDING BYLAWS, AND EXERCISING ANY
OTHER POWERS AND DUTIES EXPRESSLY RESERVED TO THE COMMISSION BY RULE
OR BYLAW; AND
I. OTHER DUTIES AS PROVIDED IN THE RULES OR BYLAWS OF
THE COMMISSION.
2. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL BE COMPOSED OF UP TO 7
MEMBERS:
A. THE CHAIR AND VICE CHAIR OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE
VOTING MEMBERS OF THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE; AND
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 617
B. THE COMMISSION SHALL ELECT 5 VOTING MEMBERS FROM
THE CURRENT MEMBERSHIP OF THE COMMISSION.
3. THE COMMISSION MAY REMOVE ANY MEMBER OF THE EXECUTIVE
COMMITTEE AS PROVIDED IN THE COMMISSION’S BYLAWS.
4. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL MEET AT LEAST ANNUALLY.
A. EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE MEETINGS SHALL BE OPEN TO THE
PUBLIC, EXCEPT THAT THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE MAY MEET IN A CLOSED,
NON–PUBLIC MEETING AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION F.2 BELOW.
B. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL GIVE 30 DAYS’ NOTICE
OF ITS MEETINGS, POSTED ON ITS WEBSITE AND AS DETERMINED TO PROVIDE
NOTICE TO PERSONS WITH AN INTEREST IN THE BUSINESS OF THE COMMISSION.
C. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE MAY HOLD A SPECIAL
MEETING IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION F.1.B. BELOW.
E. THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT AND PROVIDE TO THE MEMBER
STATES AN ANNUAL REPORT.
F. MEETINGS OF THE COMMISSION.
1. ALL MEETINGS SHALL BE OPEN TO THE PUBLIC, EXCEPT THAT
THE COMMISSION MAY MEET IN A CLOSED, NON–PUBLIC MEETING AS PROVIDED IN
SUBSECTION F.2 BELOW.
A. PUBLIC NOTICE FOR ALL MEETINGS OF THE FULL
COMMISSION SHALL BE GIVEN IN THE SAME MANNER AS REQUIRED UNDER THE
RULEMAKING PROVISIONS IN SECTION 9, EXCEPT THAT THE COMMISSION MAY
HOLD A SPECIAL MEETING AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION F.1.B. BELOW.
B. THE COMMISSION MAY HOLD A SPECIAL MEETING WHEN IT
MUST MEET TO CONDUCT EMERGENCY BUSINESS BY GIVING 48 HOURS’ NOTICE TO
ALL COMMISSIONERS, ON THE COMMISSION’S WEBSITE, AND OTHER MEANS AS
PROVIDED IN THE COMMISSION’S RULES. THE COMMISSION’S LEGAL COUNSEL
SHALL CERTIFY THAT THE COMMISSION’S NEED TO MEET QUALIFIES AS AN
EMERGENCY.
2. THE COMMISSION OR THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OR OTHER
COMMITTEES OF THE COMMISSION MAY CONVENE IN A CLOSED, NON–PUBLIC
– 13 –

Ch. 617 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
MEETING FOR THE COMMISSION OR EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OR OTHER
COMMITTEES OF THE COMMISSION TO RECEIVE LEGAL ADVICE OR TO DISCUSS:
A. NON–COMPLIANCE OF A MEMBER STATE WITH ITS
OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE COMPACT;
B. THE EMPLOYMENT, COMPENSATION, DISCIPLINE OR OTHER
MATTERS, PRACTICES, OR PROCEDURES RELATED TO SPECIFIC EMPLOYEES;
C. CURRENT OR THREATENED DISCIPLINE OF A LICENSEE BY
THE COMMISSION OR BY A MEMBER STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY;
D. CURRENT, THREATENED, OR REASONABLY ANTICIPATED
LITIGATION;
E. NEGOTIATION OF CONTRACTS FOR THE PURCHASE, LEASE,
OR SALE OF GOODS, SERVICES, OR REAL ESTATE;
F. ACCUSING ANY PERSON OF A CRIME OR FORMALLY
CENSURING ANY PERSON;
G. TRADE SECRETS OR COMMERCIAL OR FINANCIAL
INFORMATION THAT IS PRIVILEGED OR CONFIDENTIAL;
H. INFORMATION OF A PERSONAL NATURE WHERE
DISCLOSURE WOULD CONSTITUTE A CLEARLY UNWARRANTED INVASION OF
PERSONAL PRIVACY;
I. INVESTIGATIVE RECORDS COMPILED FOR LAW
ENFORCEMENT PURPOSES;
J. INFORMATION RELATED TO ANY INVESTIGATIVE REPORTS
PREPARED BY OR ON BEHALF OF OR FOR USE OF THE COMMISSION OR OTHER
COMMITTEE CHARGED WITH RESPONSIBILITY OF INVESTIGATION OR
DETERMINATION OF COMPLIANCE ISSUES PURSUANT TO THE COMPACT;
K. MATTERS SPECIFICALLY EXEMPTED FROM DISCLOSURE BY
FEDERAL OR MEMBER STATE LAW; OR
L. OTHER MATTERS AS PROMULGATED BY THE COMMISSION
BY RULE.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 617
3. IF A MEETING, OR PORTION OF A MEETING, IS CLOSED, THE
PRESIDING OFFICER SHALL STATE THAT THE MEETING WILL BE CLOSED AND
REFERENCE EACH RELEVANT EXEMPTING PROVISION, AND SUCH REFERENCE
SHALL BE RECORDED IN THE MINUTES.
4. THE COMMISSION SHALL KEEP MINUTES THAT FULLY AND
CLEARLY DESCRIBE ALL MATTERS DISCUSSED IN A MEETING AND SHALL PROVIDE A
FULL AND ACCURATE SUMMARY OF ACTIONS TAKEN, AND THE REASONS THEREFOR,
INCLUDING A DESCRIPTION OF THE VIEWS EXPRESSED. ALL DOCUMENTS
CONSIDERED IN CONNECTION WITH AN ACTION SHALL BE IDENTIFIED IN SUCH
MINUTES. ALL MINUTES AND DOCUMENTS OF A CLOSED MEETING SHALL REMAIN
UNDER SEAL, SUBJECT TO RELEASE ONLY BY A MAJORITY VOTE OF THE
COMMISSION OR ORDER OF A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION.
G. FINANCING OF THE COMMISSION.
1. THE COMMISSION SHALL PAY, OR PROVIDE FOR THE PAYMENT
OF, THE REASONABLE EXPENSES OF ITS ESTABLISHMENT, ORGANIZATION, AND
ONGOING ACTIVITIES.
2. THE COMMISSION MAY ACCEPT ANY AND ALL APPROPRIATE
REVENUE SOURCES AS PROVIDED IN C(14).
3. THE COMMISSION MAY LEVY ON AND COLLECT AN ANNUAL
ASSESSMENT FROM EACH MEMBER STATE AND IMPOSE FEES ON LICENSEES
PRACTICING IN THE MEMBER STATES UNDER AN EQUIVALENT LICENSE TO COVER
THE COST OF THE OPERATIONS AND ACTIVITIES OF THE COMMISSION AND ITS
STAFF, WHICH MUST BE IN A TOTAL AMOUNT SUFFICIENT TO COVER ITS ANNUAL
BUDGET AS APPROVED EACH YEAR FOR WHICH REVENUE IS NOT PROVIDED BY
OTHER SOURCES. THE AGGREGATE ANNUAL ASSESSMENT AMOUNT FOR MEMBER
STATES SHALL BE ALLOCATED BASED UPON A FORMULA THAT THE COMMISSION
SHALL PROMULGATE BY RULE.
4. THE COMMISSION MAY NOT INCUR OBLIGATIONS OF ANY KIND
PRIOR TO SECURING THE FUNDS ADEQUATE TO MEET THE SAME; NOR SHALL THE
COMMISSION PLEDGE THE CREDIT OF ANY OF THE MEMBER STATES, EXCEPT BY
AND WITH THE AUTHORITY OF THE MEMBER STATE.
5. THE COMMISSION SHALL KEEP ACCURATE ACCOUNTS OF ALL
RECEIPTS AND DISBURSEMENTS. THE RECEIPTS AND DISBURSEMENTS OF THE
COMMISSION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE FINANCIAL REVIEW AND ACCOUNTING
PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED UNDER ITS BYLAWS. HOWEVER, ALL RECEIPTS AND
DISBURSEMENTS OF FUNDS HANDLED BY THE COMMISSION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO
– 15 –

Ch. 617 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
AN ANNUAL FINANCIAL REVIEW BY A CERTIFIED OR LICENSED PUBLIC
ACCOUNTANT, AND THE REPORT OF THE FINANCIAL REVIEW SHALL BE INCLUDED IN
AND BECOME PART OF THE ANNUAL REPORT OF THE COMMISSION.
H. QUALIFIED IMMUNITY, DEFENSE, AND INDEMNIFICATION.
1. THE MEMBERS, OFFICERS, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, EMPLOYEES
AND REPRESENTATIVES OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE IMMUNE FROM SUIT AND
LIABILITY, BOTH PERSONALLY AND IN THEIR OFFICIAL CAPACITY, FOR ANY CLAIM
FOR DAMAGE TO OR LOSS OF PROPERTY OR PERSONAL INJURY OR OTHER CIVIL
LIABILITY CAUSED BY OR ARISING OUT OF ANY ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR,
OR OMISSION THAT OCCURRED, OR THAT THE PERSON AGAINST WHOM THE CLAIM
IS MADE HAD A REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE
OF COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES; PROVIDED THAT
NOTHING IN THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROTECT ANY SUCH
PERSON FROM SUIT OR LIABILITY FOR ANY DAMAGE, LOSS, INJURY, OR LIABILITY
CAUSED BY THE INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL OR WANTON MISCONDUCT OF THAT
PERSON. THE PROCUREMENT OF INSURANCE OF ANY TYPE BY THE COMMISSION
MAY NOT IN ANY WAY COMPROMISE OR LIMIT THE IMMUNITY GRANTED HEREUNDER.
2. THE COMMISSION SHALL DEFEND ANY MEMBER, OFFICER,
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, EMPLOYEE, AND REPRESENTATIVE OF THE COMMISSION IN
ANY CIVIL ACTION SEEKING TO IMPOSE LIABILITY ARISING OUT OF ANY ACTUAL OR
ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR OMISSION THAT OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF
COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, OR AS DETERMINED BY
THE COMMISSION THAT THE PERSON AGAINST WHOM THE CLAIM IS MADE HAD A
REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF
COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, PROVIDED THAT
NOTHING HEREIN SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT THAT PERSON FROM
RETAINING THEIR OWN COUNSEL AT THEIR OWN EXPENSE, AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, THAT THE ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR OMISSION DID NOT
RESULT FROM THAT PERSON’S INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL OR WANTON
MISCONDUCT.
3. THE COMMISSION SHALL INDEMNIFY AND HOLD HARMLESS ANY
MEMBER, OFFICER, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, EMPLOYEE, AND REPRESENTATIVE OF
THE COMMISSION FOR THE AMOUNT OF ANY SETTLEMENT OR JUDGMENT OBTAINED
AGAINST THAT PERSON ARISING OUT OF ANY ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR
OMISSION THAT OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT,
DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, OR THAT SUCH PERSON HAD A REASONABLE BASIS
FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT,
DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, PROVIDED THAT THE ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT,
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 617
ERROR, OR OMISSION DID NOT RESULT FROM THE INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL OR
WANTON MISCONDUCT OF THAT PERSON.
4. NOTHING HEREIN SHALL BE CONSTRUED AS A LIMITATION ON
THE LIABILITY OF ANY LICENSEE FOR PROFESSIONAL MALPRACTICE OR
MISCONDUCT, WHICH SHALL BE GOVERNED SOLELY BY ANY OTHER APPLICABLE
STATE LAWS.
5. NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE INTERPRETED TO WAIVE
OR OTHERWISE ABROGATE A MEMBER STATE’S STATE ACTION IMMUNITY OR STATE
ACTION AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE WITH RESPECT TO ANTITRUST CLAIMS UNDER THE
SHERMAN ACT, CLAYTON ACT, OR ANY OTHER STATE OR FEDERAL ANTITRUST OR
ANTICOMPETITIVE LAW OR REGULATION.
6. NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO BE A
WAIVER OF SOVEREIGN IMMUNITY BY THE MEMBER STATES OR BY THE
COMMISSION.
SECTION 8. FACILITATING INFORMATION EXCHANGE.
A. THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE FOR FACILITATING THE EXCHANGE
OF INFORMATION TO ADMINISTER AND IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
COMPACT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION, CONSISTENT
WITH GENERALLY ACCEPTED DATA PROTECTION PRINCIPLES.
B. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF STATE LAW TO THE
CONTRARY, A MEMBER STATE SHALL AGREE TO PROVIDE FOR THE FACILITATION
OF THE FOLLOWING LICENSEE INFORMATION AS REQUIRED BY THE RULES OF THE
COMMISSION, INCLUDING:
1. IDENTIFYING INFORMATION;
2. LICENSURE DATA;
3. ADVERSE ACTIONS AGAINST A LICENSE AND INFORMATION
RELATED THERETO;
4. NON–CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION RELATED TO ALTERNATIVE
PROGRAM PARTICIPATION, THE BEGINNING AND ENDING DATES OF SUCH
PARTICIPATION, AND OTHER INFORMATION RELATED TO SUCH PARTICIPATION NOT
MADE CONFIDENTIAL UNDER MEMBER STATE LAW;
– 17 –

Ch. 617 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
5. ANY DENIAL OF APPLICATION FOR LICENSURE, AND THE
REASON(S) FOR SUCH DENIAL;
6. THE PRESENCE OF INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION; AND
7. OTHER INFORMATION THAT MAY FACILITATE THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THIS COMPACT OR THE PROTECTION OF THE PUBLIC, AS
DETERMINED BY THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION.
C. NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE DEEMED OR CONSTRUED TO
ALTER, LIMIT, OR INHIBIT THE POWER OF A MEMBER STATE TO CONTROL AND
MAINTAIN OWNERSHIP OF ITS LICENSEE INFORMATION OR ALTER, LIMIT, OR
INHIBIT THE LAWS OR REGULATIONS GOVERNING LICENSEE INFORMATION IN THE
MEMBER STATE.
SECTION 9. RULEMAKING.
A. THE COMMISSION SHALL EXERCISE ITS RULEMAKING POWERS
PURSUANT TO THE CRITERIA SET FORTH IN THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT AND THE
RULES ADOPTED THEREUNDER. RULES AND AMENDMENTS SHALL BECOME
BINDING AS OF THE DATE SPECIFIED IN EACH RULE OR AMENDMENT.
B. THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE REASONABLE RULES TO
ACHIEVE THE INTENT AND PURPOSE OF THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT. IN THE EVENT
THE COMMISSION EXERCISES ITS RULEMAKING AUTHORITY IN A MANNER THAT IS
BEYOND THE PURPOSE AND INTENT OF THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT, OR THE
POWERS GRANTED HEREUNDER, THEN SUCH AN ACTION BY THE COMMISSION
SHALL BE INVALID AND HAVE NO FORCE AND EFFECT OF LAW IN THE MEMBER
STATES.
C. IF A MAJORITY OF THE LEGISLATURES OF THE MEMBER STATES
REJECTS A RULE, BY ENACTMENT OF A STATUTE OR RESOLUTION IN THE SAME
MANNER USED TO ADOPT THE COMPACT WITHIN FOUR (4) YEARS OF THE DATE OF
ADOPTION OF THE RULE, THEN SUCH RULE SHALL HAVE NO FURTHER FORCE AND
EFFECT IN ANY MEMBER STATE.
D. RULES OR AMENDMENTS TO THE RULES SHALL BE ADOPTED OR
RATIFIED AT A REGULAR OR SPECIAL MEETING OF THE COMMISSION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH COMMISSION RULES AND BYLAWS.
E. PRIOR TO PROMULGATION AND ADOPTION OF A FINAL RULE OR RULES
BY THE COMMISSION, AND AT LEAST THIRTY (30) DAYS IN ADVANCE OF THE
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 617
MEETING AT WHICH THE RULE WILL BE CONSIDERED AND VOTED UPON, THE
COMMISSION SHALL FILE A NOTICE OF PROPOSED RULEMAKING:
1. ON THE WEBSITE OF THE COMMISSION OR OTHER PUBLICLY
ACCESSIBLE PLATFORM; AND
2. ON THE WEBSITE OF EACH MEMBER STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY OR OTHER PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE PLATFORM OR THE PUBLICATION IN
WHICH EACH STATE WOULD OTHERWISE PUBLISH PROPOSED RULES.
F. UPON DETERMINATION THAT AN EMERGENCY EXISTS, THE
COMMISSION MAY CONSIDER AND ADOPT AN EMERGENCY RULE WITH 48 HOURS’
NOTICE, WITH OPPORTUNITY TO COMMENT, PROVIDED THAT THE USUAL
RULEMAKING PROCEDURES SHALL BE RETROACTIVELY APPLIED TO THE RULE AS
SOON AS REASONABLY POSSIBLE, IN NO EVENT LATER THAN NINETY (90) DAYS
AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE RULE. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS
PROVISION, AN EMERGENCY RULE IS ONE THAT MUST BE ADOPTED IMMEDIATELY
IN ORDER TO:
1. MEET AN IMMINENT THREAT TO PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, OR
WELFARE;
2. PREVENT A LOSS OF COMMISSION OR MEMBER STATE FUNDS;
3. MEET A DEADLINE FOR THE PROMULGATION OF AN
ADMINISTRATIVE RULE THAT IS ESTABLISHED BY FEDERAL LAW OR RULE; OR
4. PROTECT PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY.
SECTION 10. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT.
A. OVERSIGHT.
1. THE EXECUTIVE AND JUDICIAL BRANCHES OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT IN EACH MEMBER STATE SHALL ENFORCE THIS COMPACT AND TAKE
ALL ACTIONS NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE TO IMPLEMENT THE COMPACT.
2. VENUE IS PROPER AND JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS BY OR AGAINST
THE COMMISSION SHALL BE BROUGHT SOLELY AND EXCLUSIVELY IN A COURT OF
COMPETENT JURISDICTION WHERE THE PRINCIPAL OFFICE OF THE COMMISSION IS
LOCATED. THE COMMISSION MAY WAIVE VENUE AND JURISDICTIONAL DEFENSES
TO THE EXTENT IT ADOPTS OR CONSENTS TO PARTICIPATE IN ALTERNATIVE
DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCEEDINGS. NOTHING HEREIN SHALL AFFECT OR LIMIT
– 19 –

Ch. 617 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
THE SELECTION OR PROPRIETY OF VENUE IN ANY ACTION AGAINST A LICENSEE FOR
PROFESSIONAL MALPRACTICE, MISCONDUCT, OR ANY SUCH SIMILAR MATTER.
3. THE COMMISSION SHALL BE ENTITLED TO RECEIVE SERVICE OF
PROCESS IN ANY PROCEEDING REGARDING THE ENFORCEMENT OR
INTERPRETATION OF THE COMPACT AND SHALL HAVE STANDING TO INTERVENE IN
SUCH A PROCEEDING FOR ALL PURPOSES. FAILURE TO PROVIDE THE COMMISSION
SERVICE OF PROCESS SHALL RENDER A JUDGMENT OR ORDER VOID AS TO THE
COMMISSION, THIS COMPACT, OR PROMULGATED RULES.
B. DEFAULT, TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE, AND TERMINATION.
1. IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT A MEMBER STATE HAS
DEFAULTED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF ITS OBLIGATIONS OR RESPONSIBILITIES
UNDER THIS COMPACT OR THE PROMULGATED RULES, THE COMMISSION SHALL
PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE DEFAULTING STATE. THE NOTICE OF DEFAULT
SHALL DESCRIBE THE DEFAULT, THE PROPOSED MEANS OF CURING THE DEFAULT,
AND ANY OTHER ACTION THAT THE COMMISSION MAY TAKE, AND SHALL OFFER
TRAINING AND SPECIFIC TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE REGARDING THE DEFAULT.
2. THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE A COPY OF THE NOTICE OF
DEFAULT TO THE OTHER MEMBER STATES.
C. IF A STATE IN DEFAULT FAILS TO CURE THE DEFAULT, THE DEFAULTING
STATE MAY BE TERMINATED FROM THE COMPACT UPON AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF
A SUPERMAJORITY OF THE DELEGATES OF THE MEMBER STATES, AND ALL RIGHTS,
PRIVILEGES AND BENEFITS CONFERRED ON THAT STATE BY THIS COMPACT MAY BE
TERMINATED ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION. A CURE OF THE DEFAULT
DOES NOT RELIEVE THE OFFENDING STATE OF OBLIGATIONS OR LIABILITIES
INCURRED DURING THE PERIOD OF DEFAULT.
D. TERMINATION OF MEMBERSHIP IN THE COMPACT SHALL BE IMPOSED
ONLY AFTER ALL OTHER MEANS OF SECURING COMPLIANCE HAVE BEEN
EXHAUSTED. NOTICE OF INTENT TO SUSPEND OR TERMINATE SHALL BE GIVEN BY
THE COMMISSION TO THE GOVERNOR, THE MAJORITY AND MINORITY LEADERS OF
THE DEFAULTING STATE’S LEGISLATURE, THE DEFAULTING STATE’S LICENSING
AUTHORITY, AND EACH OF THE MEMBER STATES’ LICENSING AUTHORITIES.
E. A STATE THAT HAS BEEN TERMINATED IS RESPONSIBLE FOR ALL
ASSESSMENTS, OBLIGATIONS, AND LIABILITIES INCURRED THROUGH THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION, INCLUDING OBLIGATIONS THAT EXTEND
BEYOND THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION.
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 617
F. UPON THE TERMINATION OF A STATE’S MEMBERSHIP FROM THIS
COMPACT, THAT STATE SHALL IMMEDIATELY PROVIDE NOTICE TO ALL LICENSEES
WITHIN THAT STATE OF SUCH TERMINATION. THE TERMINATED STATE SHALL
CONTINUE TO RECOGNIZE ALL LICENSES GRANTED PURSUANT TO THIS COMPACT
FOR A MINIMUM OF SIX (6) MONTHS AFTER THE DATE OF SAID NOTICE OF
TERMINATION.
G. THE COMMISSION MAY NOT BEAR ANY COSTS RELATED TO A STATE
THAT IS FOUND TO BE IN DEFAULT OR THAT HAS BEEN TERMINATED FROM THE
COMPACT, UNLESS AGREED UPON IN WRITING BETWEEN THE COMMISSION AND THE
DEFAULTING STATE.
H. THE DEFAULTING STATE MAY APPEAL THE ACTION OF THE
COMMISSION BY PETITIONING THE U.S. DISTRICT COURT FOR THE DISTRICT OF
COLUMBIA OR THE FEDERAL DISTRICT WHERE THE COMMISSION HAS ITS
PRINCIPAL OFFICES. THE PREVAILING PARTY SHALL BE AWARDED ALL COSTS OF
SUCH LITIGATION, INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
I. DISPUTE RESOLUTION.
1. UPON REQUEST BY A MEMBER STATE, THE COMMISSION SHALL
ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE DISPUTES RELATED TO THE COMPACT THAT ARISE AMONG
MEMBER STATES AND BETWEEN MEMBER AND NON–MEMBER STATES.
2. THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE A RULE PROVIDING FOR
BOTH MEDIATION AND BINDING DISPUTE RESOLUTION FOR DISPUTES AS
APPROPRIATE.
J. ENFORCEMENT.
1. BY MAJORITY VOTE AS PROVIDED BY RULE, THE COMMISSION
MAY INITIATE LEGAL ACTION AGAINST A MEMBER STATE IN DEFAULT IN THE
UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT FOR THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA OR THE
FEDERAL DISTRICT WHERE THE COMMISSION HAS ITS PRINCIPAL OFFICES TO
ENFORCE COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT AND ITS
PROMULGATED RULES. THE RELIEF SOUGHT MAY INCLUDE BOTH INJUNCTIVE
RELIEF AND DAMAGES. IN THE EVENT JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT IS NECESSARY, THE
PREVAILING PARTY SHALL BE AWARDED ALL COSTS OF SUCH LITIGATION,
INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES. THE REMEDIES HEREIN MAY NOT BE
THE EXCLUSIVE REMEDIES OF THE COMMISSION. THE COMMISSION MAY PURSUE
ANY OTHER REMEDIES AVAILABLE UNDER FEDERAL OR THE DEFAULTING MEMBER
STATE’S LAW.
– 21 –

Ch. 617 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. A MEMBER STATE MAY INITIATE LEGAL ACTION AGAINST THE
COMMISSION IN THE U.S. DISTRICT COURT FOR THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA OR
THE FEDERAL DISTRICT WHERE THE COMMISSION HAS ITS PRINCIPAL OFFICES TO
ENFORCE COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT AND ITS
PROMULGATED RULES. THE RELIEF SOUGHT MAY INCLUDE BOTH INJUNCTIVE
RELIEF AND DAMAGES. IN THE EVENT JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT IS NECESSARY, THE
PREVAILING PARTY SHALL BE AWARDED ALL COSTS OF SUCH LITIGATION,
INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
3. NO PERSON OTHER THAN A MEMBER STATE SHALL ENFORCE
THIS COMPACT AGAINST THE COMMISSION.
SECTION 11. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT.
A. THE COMPACT SHALL COME INTO EFFECT ON THE DATE ON WHICH THE
COMPACT STATUTE IS ENACTED INTO LAW IN THE SEVENTH MEMBER STATE.
1. ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE COMPACT INDICATED
ABOVE, THE COMMISSION SHALL CONVENE AND REVIEW THE ENACTMENT OF EACH
OF THE CHARTER MEMBER STATES TO DETERMINE IF THE STATUTE ENACTED BY
EACH SUCH CHARTER MEMBER STATE IS MATERIALLY DIFFERENT THAN THE
MODEL COMPACT STATUTE.
A. A CHARTER MEMBER STATE WHOSE ENACTMENT IS FOUND
TO BE MATERIALLY DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL COMPACT STATUTE SHALL BE
ENTITLED TO THE DEFAULT PROCESS SET FORTH IN SECTION 10.
B. IF ANY MEMBER STATE IS LATER FOUND TO BE IN DEFAULT,
OR IS TERMINATED OR WITHDRAWS FROM THE COMPACT, THE COMMISSION SHALL
REMAIN IN EXISTENCE AND THE COMPACT SHALL REMAIN IN EFFECT EVEN IF THE
NUMBER OF MEMBER STATES SHOULD BE LESS THAN SEVEN.
2. MEMBER STATES ENACTING THE COMPACT SUBSEQUENT TO THE
CHARTER MEMBER STATES SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE PROCESS SET FORTH IN
SECTION 7.C(22) TO DETERMINE IF THEIR ENACTMENTS ARE MATERIALLY
DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL COMPACT STATUTE AND WHETHER THEY QUALIFY
FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT.
3. ALL ACTIONS TAKEN FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE COMMISSION OR
IN FURTHERANCE OF THE PURPOSES OF THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE COMPACT
PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE COMPACT OR THE COMMISSION COMING
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 617
INTO EXISTENCE SHALL BE CONSIDERED TO BE ACTIONS OF THE COMMISSION
UNLESS SPECIFICALLY REPUDIATED BY THE COMMISSION.
A. ANY STATE THAT JOINS THE COMPACT SUBSEQUENT TO
THE COMMISSION’S INITIAL ADOPTION OF THE RULES AND BYLAWS SHALL BE
SUBJECT TO THE RULES AND BYLAWS AS THEY EXIST ON THE DATE ON WHICH THE
COMPACT BECOMES LAW IN THAT STATE. ANY RULE THAT HAS BEEN PREVIOUSLY
ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION SHALL HAVE THE FULL FORCE AND EFFECT OF LAW
ON THE DAY THE COMPACT BECOMES LAW IN THAT STATE.
B. ANY MEMBER STATE MAY WITHDRAW FROM THIS COMPACT
BY ENACTING A STATUTE REPEALING THE SAME.
B. A MEMBER STATE’S WITHDRAWAL MAY NOT TAKE EFFECT UNTIL 180
DAYS AFTER ENACTMENT OF THE REPEALING STATUTE.
C. WITHDRAWAL MAY NOT AFFECT THE CONTINUING REQUIREMENT OF
THE WITHDRAWING STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY TO COMPLY WITH THE
INVESTIGATIVE AND ADVERSE ACTION REPORTING REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
COMPACT PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF WITHDRAWAL.
D. UPON THE ENACTMENT OF A STATUTE WITHDRAWING FROM THIS
COMPACT, A STATE SHALL IMMEDIATELY PROVIDE NOTICE OF SUCH WITHDRAWAL
TO ALL LICENSEES WITHIN THAT STATE. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY SUBSEQUENT
STATUTORY ENACTMENT TO THE CONTRARY, SUCH WITHDRAWING STATE SHALL
CONTINUE TO RECOGNIZE ALL LICENSES GRANTED PURSUANT TO THIS COMPACT
FOR A MINIMUM OF SIX (6) MONTHS AFTER THE DATE OF SUCH NOTICE OF
WITHDRAWAL.
1. NOTHING CONTAINED IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED
TO INVALIDATE OR PREVENT ANY LICENSURE AGREEMENT OR OTHER COOPERATIVE
ARRANGEMENT BETWEEN A MEMBER STATE AND A NON–MEMBER STATE THAT
DOES NOT CONFLICT WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS COMPACT.
2. THIS COMPACT MAY BE AMENDED BY THE MEMBER STATES. NO
AMENDMENT TO THIS COMPACT SHALL BECOME EFFECTIVE AND BINDING UPON
ANY MEMBER STATE UNTIL IT IS ENACTED INTO THE LAWS OF ALL MEMBER STATES.
SECTION 12. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY.
A. THIS COMPACT AND THE COMMISSION’S RULEMAKING AUTHORITY
SHALL BE LIBERALLY CONSTRUED SO AS TO EFFECTUATE THE PURPOSES AND THE
IMPLEMENTATION AND ADMINISTRATION OF THE COMPACT. PROVISIONS OF THE
– 23 –

Ch. 617 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
COMPACT EXPRESSLY AUTHORIZING OR REQUIRING THE PROMULGATION OF
RULES MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT THE COMMISSION’S RULEMAKING
AUTHORITY SOLELY FOR THOSE PURPOSES.
B. THE PROVISIONS OF THIS COMPACT SHALL BE SEVERABLE AND IF ANY
PHRASE, CLAUSE, SENTENCE OR PROVISION OF THIS COMPACT IS HELD BY A COURT
OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION TO BE CONTRARY TO THE CONSTITUTION OF ANY
MEMBER STATE, A STATE SEEKING PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT, OR OF THE
UNITED STATES, OR THE APPLICABILITY THEREOF TO ANY GOVERNMENT, AGENCY,
PERSON, OR CIRCUMSTANCE IS HELD TO BE UNCONSTITUTIONAL BY A COURT OF
COMPETENT JURISDICTION, THE VALIDITY OF THE REMAINDER OF THIS COMPACT
AND THE APPLICABILITY THEREOF TO ANY OTHER GOVERNMENT, AGENCY, PERSON,
OR CIRCUMSTANCE MAY NOT BE AFFECTED THEREBY.
C. NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION B OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION MAY DENY A STATE’S PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT OR, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 10.B, TERMINATE A MEMBER
STATE’S PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT, IF IT DETERMINES THAT A
CONSTITUTIONAL REQUIREMENT OF A MEMBER STATE IS A MATERIAL DEPARTURE
FROM THE COMPACT. OTHERWISE, IF THIS COMPACT SHALL BE HELD TO BE
CONTRARY TO THE CONSTITUTION OF ANY MEMBER STATE, THE COMPACT SHALL
REMAIN IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT AS TO THE REMAINING MEMBER STATES AND
IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT AS TO THE MEMBER STATE AFFECTED AS TO ALL
SEVERABLE MATTERS.
SECTION 13. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS.
A. NOTHING HEREIN SHALL PREVENT OR INHIBIT THE ENFORCEMENT OF
ANY OTHER LAW OF A MEMBER STATE THAT IS NOT INCONSISTENT WITH THE
COMPACT.
B. ANY LAWS, STATUTES, REGULATIONS, OR OTHER LEGAL
REQUIREMENTS IN A MEMBER STATE IN CONFLICT WITH THE COMPACT ARE
SUPERSEDED TO THE EXTENT OF THE CONFLICT.
C. ALL PERMISSIBLE AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE COMMISSION AND THE
MEMBER STATES ARE BINDING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THEIR TERMS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 24 –